Washington statutes.
RCW 43.167.007

Purpose.

(1) Community preservation and development authorities are hereby created to restore or enhance the health, safety, and economic well-being of communities adversely impacted by the construction of, or ongoing operation of, multiple major public facilities, public works, and capital projects with significant public funding or by other land use decisions.

(2) Community preservation and development authorities must have one or more of the following purposes:

(a) To revitalize, enhance, and preserve the unique character of impacted communities;

(b) To mitigate the adverse effects of multiple major public facilities projects, public works projects, or capital projects with significant public funding, a secure community transition facility as defined in RCW 71.09.020, or other land use decisions;

(c) To restore a local area's sense of community;

(d) To reduce the displacement of community members and businesses;

(e) To stimulate the community's economic vitality;

(f) To enhance public service provisions;

(g) To improve the standard of living of community members; or

(h) To preserve historic buildings or areas by returning them to economically productive uses that are compatible with or enhance their historic character.

[ 2019 c 447 s 2.]

NOTES:

Findings—2019 c 447: "The legislature finds that:

(1) Both state and local land use actions, such as the siting of major public facilities, public works, and capital projects with significant public funding, and other land use decisions, generally aim to accrue broad benefits to the people of Washington and local communities.

(2) The local stakeholder community which bears the disproportionate costs of such a land use decision by absorbing the deleterious impacts of the decision are often overlooked or inadequately addressed. These impacts may include dislocation, displacement, and the overall disintegration of an identifiable existing community and its historical and cultural character.

(3) The preservation and restoration of the character of such a community, and the community's historical and cultural character, are important public policy goals that can be achieved through the creation of community preservation and development authorities." [ 2019 c 447 s 1.]